Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
ARTICLE 134
DISSOLUTION

Cross references:

For definitions applicable to this article, see §§ 7-90-102 and 7-121-401.

Section

PART 1 VOLUNTARY DISSOLUTION

PART 2 ADMINISTRATIVE DISSOLUTION

PART 3 JUDICIAL DISSOLUTION

PART 4 DISSOLUTION UPON EXPIRATION
OF PERIOD OF DURATION

PART 5 MISCELLANEOUS